Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2549.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 1325. Contributions for the deaf and hard of hearing.(a) Contributions.--Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall provide for all of the following:(1) The ability of a person renewing a driver's license or identification card electronically through the department's publicly accessible Internet website to make a contribution of $5 to the office.<--<--123456789101112131415161718 (2) The ability of a person renewing a vehicle registration electronically through the department's publicly accessible Internet website to make a contribution of $5 to the office.(b) Implementation.--(1) A contribution under subsection (a) shall be added, as appropriate, to the regular fee for a:(i) renewal of a driver's license or identification card; and(ii) renewal of a vehicle registration.(2) One contribution under subsection (a) may be made for each:(i) renewal of a driver's license or identification card; and(ii) renewal of a vehicle registration.(c) Use.--Contributions made under subsection (a) shall be used by the office exclusively to provide communication access for the deaf and hard of hearing.(d) Deposits.--The department shall determine annually the total amount designated under this section and shall report the amount to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer the amount from the Motor License Fund to the office.(e) Information.--The department shall provide adequate information concerning the contribution under subsection (a) in its instructions for the applicants described under subsection (a). The information concerning the contribution shall include the address of the office to which contributions may be sent by individuals wishing to make additional contributions.(f) Reporting.--The office shall report annually to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry 20260HB2549PN3750 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives on the amount received from the contributions authorized by this section and how the funds were used.(g) Reimbursement.--The office shall reimburse the Motor License Fund for the actual costs incurred by the department in the administration of this section in the fiscal year incurred . (h) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "o ffice" means the Office for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing established under section 2(a) of the act of December 16, 1986 (P.L.1621, No.184), entitled "An act establishing and imposing powers and duties on the Office for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing in the Department of Labor and Industry; and establishing and providing powers and duties for the Advisory Council for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing in the Department of Labor and Industry."§ 1326. Contributions for the Shriners Hospitals for Children.(a) Electronic renewal contribution option.-- Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall provide for all of the following:(1) Ability of a person renewing a driver's license or identification card electronically through the department's publicly accessible Internet website to make a contribution of $5 to Shriners Hospitals for Children.(2) Ability of a person renewing a vehicle registration electronically through the department's publicly accessible Internet website to make a contribution of $5 to Shriners Hospitals for Children.(b) Implementation.-- (1) A contribution under subsection (a) shall be added, as appropriate, to the regular fee for:20260HB2549PN3750 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) a renewal of a driver's license or identification card; or(ii) a renewal of a vehicle registration.(2) One contribution under subsection (a) may be made for:(i) each renewal of a driver's license or identification card; and(ii) each renewal of a vehicle registration.(c) Use.-- Contributions made under subsection (a) shall be used exclusively by Shriners Hospitals for Children facilities in this Commonwealth.(d) Deposits.-- The department shall determine annually the total amount designated under this section and shall report the amount to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer the amount from the Motor License Fund to Shriners Hospitals for Children.(e) Information.-- The department shall provide adequate information concerning the contribution under subsection (a) in its instructions for the applicants described under subsection (a). The information concerning the contribution shall include the addresses of the Shriners Hospitals for Children facilities in this Commonwealth to which contributions may be sent by individuals wishing to make additional contributions.(f) Reporting.-- Shriners Hospitals for Children shall report annually to the respective committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives that have jurisdiction over health matters on the amount received from the contributions authorized by this section and how the funds were used.(g) Reimbursement.--Shriners Hospitals for Children shall reimburse the Motor License Fund for the actual costs incurred 20260HB2549PN3750 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the department in the administration of this section in the fiscal year incurred.§ 1327. CONTRIBUTIONS TO FIRE COMPANY GRANT PROGRAM.(A) GENERAL RULE.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE FOR ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) ABILITY OF A PERSON RENEWING A DRIVER'S LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION CARD ELECTRONICALLY THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE TO MAKE A CONTRIBUTION OF $5 TO THE FIRE COMPANY GRANT PROGRAM.(2) ABILITY OF A PERSON RENEWING A VEHICLE REGISTRATION ELECTRONICALLY THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE TO MAKE A CONTRIBUTION OF $5 TO THE FIRE COMPANY GRANT PROGRAM.(B) IMPLEMENTATION.--(1) A CONTRIBUTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE ADDED, AS APPROPRIATE, TO THE REGULAR FEE FOR:(I) A RENEWAL OF A DRIVER'S LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION CARD; AND(II) A RENEWAL OF A VEHICLE REGISTRATION.(2) ONE CONTRIBUTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) MAY BE MADE FOR:(I) EACH RENEWAL OF A DRIVER'S LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION CARD; AND(II) EACH RENEWAL OF A VEHICLE REGISTRATION.(C) USE.--CONTRIBUTIONS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE USED BY THE STATE FIRE COMMISSIONER EXCLUSIVELY FOR THE FIRE COMPANY GRANT PROGRAM.(D) DEPOSITS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DETERMINE ANNUALLY THE TOTAL AMOUNT DESIGNATED UNDER THIS SECTION AND SHALL REPORT THE AMOUNT TO THE STATE TREASURER WHO SHALL TRANSFER THE AMOUNT FROM 20260HB2549PN3750 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND FOR USE BY THE STATE FIRE COMMISSION ON GRANTS UNDER THE FIRE COMPANY GRANT PROGRAM.(E) INFORMATION.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE ADEQUATE INFORMATION CONCERNING THE CONTRIBUTION FOR THE FIRE COMPANY GRANT PROGRAM IN ITS INSTRUCTIONS FOR THE APPLICANTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A). THE INFORMATION CONCERNING THE CONTRIBUTION SHALL INCLUDE THE ADDRESS OF THE STATE FIRE COMMISSIONER TO WHICH CONTRIBUTIONS MAY BE SENT BY INDIVIDUALS WISHING TO MAKE ADDITIONAL CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE FIRE COMPANY GRANT PROGRAM.(F) REIMBURSEMENT.--THE FIRE COMPANY GRANT PROGRAM MAY REIMBURSE THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND FOR THE ACTUAL COSTS INCURRED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN THE ADMINISTRATION OF THIS SECTION.(G) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "FIRE COMPANY GRANT PROGRAM" MEANS THE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER 35 PA.C.S. CH. 78 SUBCH. B (RELATING TO FIRE COMPANY GRANT PROGRAM).§ 1328. CONTRIBUTIONS TO EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM.(A) GENERAL RULE.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE FOR ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) ABILITY OF A PERSON RENEWING A DRIVER'S LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION CARD ELECTRONICALLY THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE TO MAKE A CONTRIBUTION OF $5 TO THE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM.(2) ABILITY OF A PERSON RENEWING A VEHICLE REGISTRATION ELECTRONICALLY THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE TO MAKE A CONTRIBUTION OF $5 TO THE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM.(B) IMPLEMENTATION.--(1) A CONTRIBUTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE ADDED, 20260HB2549PN3750 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AS APPROPRIATE, TO THE REGULAR FEE FOR:(I) A RENEWAL OF A DRIVER'S LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION CARD; AND(II) A RENEWAL OF A VEHICLE REGISTRATION.(2) ONE CONTRIBUTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) MAY BE MADE FOR:(I) EACH RENEWAL OF A DRIVER'S LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION CARD; AND(II) EACH RENEWAL OF A VEHICLE REGISTRATION.(C) USE.--CONTRIBUTIONS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE USED BY THE STATE FIRE COMMISSIONER EXCLUSIVELY FOR THE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM.(D) DEPOSITS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DETERMINE ANNUALLY THE TOTAL AMOUNT DESIGNATED UNDER THIS SECTION AND SHALL REPORT THE AMOUNT TO THE STATE TREASURER WHO SHALL TRANSFER THE AMOUNT FROM THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND FOR USE BY THE STATE FIRE COMMISSIONER ON GRANTS UNDER THE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM.(E) INFORMATION.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE ADEQUATE INFORMATION CONCERNING THE CONTRIBUTION FOR THE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM IN ITS INSTRUCTIONS FOR THE APPLICANTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A). THE INFORMATION CONCERNING THE CONTRIBUTION SHALL INCLUDE THE ADDRESS OF THE STATE FIRE COMMISSIONER TO WHICH CONTRIBUTIONS MAY BE SENT BY INDIVIDUALS WISHING TO MAKE ADDITIONAL CONTRIBUTIONS FOR THE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM.(F) REIMBURSEMENT.--THE STATE FIRE COMMISSIONER MAY REIMBURSE THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND FOR THE ACTUAL COSTS INCURRED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN THE ADMINISTRATION OF THIS SECTION.(G) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM 20260HB2549PN3750 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM" MEANS THE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER 35 PA.C.S. CH. 78 SUBCH. C (RELATING TO EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 25 months.20260HB2549PN3750 - 8 - 1234